Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2338.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 5061HV (1) 91 jda/jh H.F. 2338 Section 1. Section 256.11, subsection 4, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (6), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (6) Age-appropriate Subject to section 279.80, 3 age-appropriate and research-based human growth and development 4 that incorporates . The human growth and development 5 instruction shall incorporate the standards established under 6 section 279.50, subsection 3 , paragraph âbâ . 7 Sec. 2. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph j, 8 subparagraph (1), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 9 (1) One unit of health education which may include personal 10 any of the following: 11 (a) Personal health ; food . 12 (b) Food and nutrition ; environmental . 13 (c) Environmental health ; safety . 14 (d) Safety and survival skills ; consumer . 15 (e) Consumer health ; family . 16 (f) Family life ; age-appropriate . 17 (g) Subject to section 279.80, age-appropriate and 18 research-based human growth and development that incorporates . 19 The human growth and development instruction shall incorporate 20 the standards established under section 279.50, subsection 3 , 21 paragraph âbâ ; substance . 22 (h) Substance use disorder and nonuse ; emotional . 23 (i) Emotional and social health ; health . 24 (j) Health resources ; cardiopulmonary . 25 (k) Cardiopulmonary resuscitation ; and prevention . 26 (l) Prevention and control of disease, including 27 age-appropriate and research-based information regarding 28 sexually transmitted diseases. 29 Sec. 3. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph q, Code 30 2026, is amended to read as follows: 31 q. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of 32 section 279.80 relating to sexual orientation and gender theory 33 instruction in kindergarten through grade six twelve in the 34 same manner as a school district. 35 -1- LSB 5061HV (1) 91 jda/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 2338 Sec. 4. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, paragraph o, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 o. Be subject to and comply with the requirements of 3 section 279.80 relating to sexual orientation and gender theory 4 instruction in kindergarten through grade six twelve in the 5 same manner as a school district. 6 Sec. 5. Section 279.50, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 7 2026, is amended to read as follows: 8 a. Each Subject to section 279.80, each school board shall 9 provide age-appropriate and research-based instruction in 10 human growth and development including instruction regarding 11 human sexuality, self-esteem, stress management, interpersonal 12 relationships, domestic abuse, and the prevention and control 13 of disease, including sexually transmitted diseases as required 14 in section 256.11 , in grades seven through twelve. 15 Sec. 6. Section 279.80, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 2. A school district shall not provide any program, 18 curriculum, test, survey, questionnaire, promotion, or 19 instruction relating to gender theory or sexual orientation to 20 students in kindergarten through grade six twelve . 21